District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.63

General obligation bonds.

(a)

After each act of the Council of the District of Columbia under § 1-204.62(a) authorizing the issuance of general obligation bonds has taken effect, the Mayor shall publish such act at least once in at least 1 newspaper of general circulation within the District together with a notice that such act has taken effect. Each such notice shall be in substantially the following form:

NOTICE

The following act of the Council of the District of Columbia (published with this notice) authorizing the issuance of general obligation bonds has taken effect. As provided in the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, the time within which a suit, action, or proceeding questioning the validity of such bonds may be commenced expires at the end of the 20-day period beginning on the date of the first publication of this notice.

. . . . . . . . . . . . .

Mayor

(b)

Neither the failure to publish the notice provided for in subsection (a) of this section nor any error in any publication of such notice shall impair the effectiveness of the act of the Council authorizing the issuance of such bonds or the validity of any bond issued pursuant to such act.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 804, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 463
Dec. 23, 1981, 95 Stat. 1493, Pub. L. 97-105, § 6

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-204.64.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-323.
1973 Ed., § 47-243.

References in Text

The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, referred to in this section, is 87 Stat. 774, Pub. L. 93-198, approved December 24, 1973.

Editor's Notes

Enactment upon adoption of federal legislation: Section 4 of D.C. Law 11-254 provided that “§§ 47-101, 47-117, 47-130, 47-301, 47-302, 47-303, 47-304, 47-304.1, 47-305, 47-310, 47-312, 47-317.1 through 47-317.6, 47-321 through 47-325, 47-327 through 47-331, and 47-332 through 47-334 of Title 47 §§ 1-204.41, 1-204.55, 1-204.50, 1-204.42, 1-204.43, 1-204.44, 1-204.46, 1-204.53, 1-204.47, 1-204.48, 1-204.49, 1-204.24a through 1-204.24e, 47-317.06, 1-204.61 through 1-204.65, 1-204.71 through 1-204.75, 1-204.81, 1-204.85, 1-204.86 and 1-204.90, 2001 Ed. of the District of Columbia Code shall be enacted as part of Title 47 upon the adoption by Congress of legislation so enacting these sections.”